Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.220

Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares is not liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were approved to be issued under RCW 23B.06.210 or specified in the subscription agreement under RCW 23B.06.200.

[ 2009 c 189 s 9; 1989 c 165 s 50.]